Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 363A.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Freedom from discrimination. (a) It is the public policy of this state to secure for persons in this state, freedom from discrimination: (1) in employment because of one or more of the following: race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, marital status, disability, status with regard to public assistance, sexual orientation, familial status, and age; (2) in housing and real property because of one or more of the following: race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, marital status, disability, status with regard to public assistance, sexual orientation, and familial status; (3) in public accommodations because of one or more of the following: race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, and disability; (4) in public services because of one or more of the following: race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, marital status, disability, sexual orientation, and status with regard to public assistance; and (5) in education because of one or more of the following: race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, gender identity, marital status, disability, status with regard to public assistance, sexual orientation, and age. (b) Such discrimination threatens the rights and privileges of the inhabitants of this state and menaces the institutions and foundations of democracy. It is also the public policy of this state to protect all persons from wholly unfounded charges of discrimination. Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as restricting the implementation of positive action programs to combat discrimination. new text begin (c) Failure to engage in the process to determine if a reasonable accommodation exists that would allow people with disabilities as defined in section 363A.03, subdivision 12, to participate fully in employment, housing and real property, public accommodations, public services, and education may be an unfair discriminatory practice under this chapter. new text end